California statutes. Education Code
-------------------------------------------

37686.

(a) If a district fails to meet its annual numerical goals for any two consecutive years between 2005 and 2012, the district shall be prohibited from all the following until the district achieves substantial progress toward meeting its annual numerical goals:

(1) Approving any new construction or new portable classroom other than a project directly designed to eliminate the use of the Concept 6 program or to reduce reliance on capacity-related busing that transports pupils more than 40 minutes to or from school.

(2) To the extent permitted by law, designating revenues from developer fees for any purpose not directly related to eliminating the Concept 6 program or reducing reliance on capacity-related busing.

(3) Approving the issuance of a Certificate of Participation for any school facilities-related purpose not directly related to the elimination of the Concept 6 program or reducing reliance on capacity-related busing.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not preclude a district from using funding from any source for a project that is eligible for hardship funding approved by the State Allocation Board pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 17075.10) of Chapter 12.5 of Part 10.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37687.

(a) A district that plans to operate a Concept 6 program after June 30, 2009, shall by July 1 of 2009, and by July 1 of any succeeding year in which it plans to operate a Concept 6 program, submit evidence in writing to establish to the satisfaction of the Superintendent of Public Instruction that it has developed a specific school building plan to provide adequate pupil capacity to eliminate the Concept 6 program by the earliest practicable date and no later than July 1, 2012.

(b) The superintendent shall evaluate the written submission to determine whether the district has developed a specific school building plan and shall submit a report to the state board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37688.

(a) If on or after July 31, 2008, and any succeeding year in which a district operates a Concept 6 program, the state board finds that a district has failed to make substantial progress in eliminating the Concept 6 program, or if on or after July 31, 2009, and any succeeding year in which a district operates a Concept 6 program, the state board finds that a district has failed to develop a specific school building plan, the state board shall hold a public hearing to determine the cause of the failure and the remedies to be undertaken by the state board to ensure elimination of the Concept 6 program by the earliest practicable date and no later than July 1, 2012.

(b) Prior to the public hearing, the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the State Allocation Board shall each provide a written analysis and opinion to the state board as to the cause of the failure and the remedies proposed to be undertaken. The State Allocation Board shall render its opinion based upon a written analysis prepared by the Office of Public School Construction. The district may submit its own analysis as to the cause of the failure and remedies it proposes to be undertaken.

(c) After the public hearing, the state board shall adopt a remedial plan that the district shall follow to ensure elimination of the Concept 6 program by the earliest practicable date and no later than July 1, 2012.

(d) (1) If the state board determines that the failure of a district to achieve substantial progress or develop a specific school building plan is due to circumstances beyond the control of the district, the remedial plan adopted by the state board may provide for technical assistance to the district from the department, the Office of Public School Construction, or the Division of the State Architect. The remedial plan may also recommend action for state financial assistance necessary to enable the district to eliminate the Concept 6 program by the earliest date practicable and no later than July 1, 2012.

(2) If the state board determines that the failure of the district to achieve substantial progress or develop a specific school building plan is not due to circumstances beyond the control of the district, but due to its failure to act diligently to plan for the elimination of the Concept 6 program or to execute its comprehensive action plan, the remedial plan shall mandate at least quarterly review and oversight of the district by the department. The remedial plan may also include any of the measures described in paragraph (1) or other measures as the state board deems necessary to enable the district to eliminate the Concept 6 program by the earliest date practicable and no later than July 1, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37689.

(a) In addition to Section 37688, on or after July 31, 2009, if the state board determines that the failure of a district to achieve substantial progress or develop a specific school building plan is not due to circumstances beyond the control of the district, but due to its failure to act diligently to plan for the elimination of the Concept 6 program or to execute its comprehensive action plan, the board shall hold a public hearing to determine whether the state board should implement direct oversight of the district’s facilities construction program.

(b) If the state board determines that direct oversight is necessary, the state board shall implement the oversight within 90 days of that determination.

(1) Direct oversight by the state board shall consist of assigning a monitor to the district who shall report to the state board at each of its regularly scheduled meetings on progress made by the district in working toward the elimination of the Concept 6 program. The monitor shall have relevant experience in engineering, construction, or management of major public works projects and shall have the resources and authority to contract with appropriate professionals in the fields of program management, project management, and finance. In selecting a monitor, the state board shall receive nominees from, and consult with, the superintendent of the district, the Office of Public School Construction, and the citizens’ oversight committee of the district, established under Section 15278.

(2) The monitor shall make recommendations to the district with respect to the planning and implementation of its school construction program. The district shall follow the recommendations of the monitor unless the district shows, to the satisfaction of the state board, good cause for not doing so. The district shall notify the state board if it disputes a recommendation and the state board shall hold a public hearing to hear and decide the dispute within 30 days of receiving the notice.

(3) The district and the citizens’ oversight committee shall have an opportunity to appear at the public hearing and provide written or oral testimony to support their positions.

(4) A recommendation of the monitor that is mandatory, as opposed to prohibitory, shall be stayed during the time the dispute is before the state board.

(5) Upon the conclusion of the public hearing, the state board shall direct the district to implement the recommendations of the monitor if it finds, in consultation with the Office of Public School Construction, that the district lacks good cause for failing to implement the recommendations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37690.

All reports required by a district to be submitted to a state agency pursuant to this article shall be made available to the public. An interested party shall be permitted to submit comments regarding a report to the appropriate state agency within a reasonable time following the submission of the report to that state agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37691.

A Concept 6 program conducted pursuant to this article is eligible for apportionment from the State School Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37692.

On or before July 1, 2008, the department, in consultation with the Office of Public School Construction, shall conduct a survey to determine whether the school districts operating Concept 6 programs will phase out the program by the 2009–10 fiscal year and shall submit a copy of the results of the survey to the Assembly Committee on Education, the Senate Committee on Education, and the Department of Finance. Based on the survey, the Legislature shall determine whether to repeal the authority to operate a Concept 6 program prior to July 1, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37693.

(a) A Concept 6 program may not be operated after July 1, 2012, or such earlier date as may be prescribed by the Legislature pursuant to Section 37692.

(b) Although the Concept 6 program is authorized until July 1, 2012, it is the intent of the Legislature that all school districts eliminate the Concept 6 program as soon as practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37694.

A school district operating a Concept 6 program is exempt from the requirements of Section 37202.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37695.

(a) A pupil participating in a Concept 6 program shall not be credited with more than one day of attendance in any calendar day, except as permitted in Section 46140.

(b) Average daily attendance generated at a regular elementary, junior high, or high school operated pursuant to this article shall be calculated as prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 41601.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 37640, subdivision (a) of Section 41601, and any other law, the number of days taught in one or more late entry makeup classes in which a pupil in a Concept 6 program is enrolled shall be disregarded, at the option of a school district, in calculating the number of days taught in the calculation of average daily attendance of that district for any school year, if the pupil entered the Concept 6 program after September 1 of that school year and the track in which the pupil is enrolled began instruction in July or August of that school year. For purposes of this subdivision, “late entry makeup class” is a class in which a pupil in a Concept 6 program is enrolled in order to compensate for the pupil’s late enrollment in that program. The number of days taught that are disregarded under this subdivision shall not exceed the number of schooldays occurring in the school year prior to September 1 in the track in which the pupil is enrolled, reduced by the number of schooldays, if any, occurring in a program operating under the traditional school calendar in which the pupil was enrolled in that school district in the same school year prior to the date upon which the pupil is first enrolled in the Concept 6 program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Four-Day School Week [37700. - 37712.]

37700.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Big Sur Unified School District, the Leggett Valley Unified School District, and the Reeds Creek Elementary School District may operate one or more schools in their respective school districts on a four-day school week, if the school district complies with the instructional time requirements specified in Section 37701 and the other requirements of this chapter.

(b) (1) A school district operating one or more schools on a four-day school week pursuant to this section shall annually, not later than June 1, submit to the department for review and approval a plan for how the school district will ensure that the minimum instructional minutes required under Section 46207 will be met in the following school
 year.

(2) If the school district offered less than the minimum instructional minutes required under Section 46207, the school district shall be subject to the penalties described in subdivision (b) of Section 46207 and subdivision (c) of Section 46208. Nothing in this section shall be construed to subject a school district that has met the minimum instructional minutes required under Section 46207 to those penalties.

(c) A school district with an exclusive bargaining representative may operate a school on a four-day school week pursuant to this section only if the school district and the representative of each bargaining unit of school district employees mutually agree to that operation in a memorandum of understanding.

(d) Instructional time penalties shall not be imposed pursuant to this section, as this section
 read on June 1, 2019, for the 2016–17 fiscal year to the 2018–19 fiscal year, inclusive, on a school district operating one or more schools on a four-day school week.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section and Section 37701, for the 2020–21 fiscal year only, the Big Sur Unified School District, the Leggett Valley Unified School District, and the Reeds Creek Elementary School District may operate one or more schools in their respective school districts on a four-day school week, if the school district complies with the following requirements and the other requirements of this chapter:

(1) Each day, pupils shall be scheduled for at least the minimum day for their grade level, as provided in Section 43501.

(2) The school district shall offer a minimum of 144 days of instruction for the 2020–21
 school year.

(3) Instructional minutes shall be determined as follows:

(A) For in-person instruction, instructional minutes shall be based on time scheduled under the immediate physical supervision and control of an employee of the local educational agency who possesses a valid certification document, registered as required by law.

(B) For distance learning, instructional time shall be based on the time value of assignments as determined, and certified to, by an employee of the local educational agency who possesses a valid certification document, registered as required by law.

(C) For a combined day of instruction delivered through both in-person instruction and distance learning, time scheduled under the immediate supervision of an employee of the
 local educational agency who possesses a valid certification document can be combined with assignments made under the general supervision of an employee of the local educational agency who possesses a valid certification document as registered by law to meet the equivalent of a minimum day of instruction.

(4) If the school district offers instruction through distance learning, the requirements of distance learning in Part 24.5 (commencing with Section 43500).

(5) If the school district does not meet the minimum instructional day requirements in Section 43501, the school district shall be subject to the penalties described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 43504.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 110, Sec. 9.   (SB 820)   Effective September 18, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

37701.

The school district shall provide on an annual basis, while operating a school on a four-day school week, not less than 560 hours of instructional time for kindergarten, not less than 700 hours of instructional time for grades 1, 2, and 3, and not less than 845 hours of instructional time for grades 4 to 12, inclusive. The school district may exceed these minimum instructional times except that no pupil in a kindergarten shall be kept in school more than four hours in any day, exclusive of recesses. The school day may not exceed eight hours, nor may the school week be less than four days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 465, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

37702.

Prior to operating a school on a four-day school week, the school district shall secure the approval of the governing board of the district and of any collective bargaining agents representing employees of the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 465, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

37703.

A school site council in the school district shall be involved in the planning and evaluation of a four-day school week.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 465, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

37704.

The school district shall consider the impact of the longer schoolday on primary grade pupils, and the impact of the four-day school week on working parents who may be required to find child care services for their schoolage children due to the shortened school week.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 465, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

37706.

If a school district elects to operate a school on a four-day school week as authorized by this chapter, the school district shall be entitled to receive the same support, but not more support, from the State School Fund due to the average daily attendance at the schools within the school district that it would have received if the school district had been operating under the provisions of law relating to the 175-day school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 465, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

37707.

If the school district elects to operate a school on a four-day school week pursuant to this chapter, the reduced number of schooldays in the school district shall not affect the rights of certificated or classified employees of the school district with regard to classification, tenure, or notice, and shall not otherwise affect the contract rights of the employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 465, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

37710.

If a school operating on a four-day school week pursuant to Section 37710.3, 37710.5, 37711, or 37712 fails to achieve its Academic Performance Index growth target pursuant to Section 52052, the authority of that school to operate on a four-day school week shall be permanently revoked commencing with the beginning of the following school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 716, Sec. 1.   (SB 236)   Effective October 10, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

37711.

Beginning in the 2004–05 fiscal year, the following school districts in San Diego County may operate one or more schools in their respective districts on a four-day school week if the districts comply with the instructional time requirements specified in Section 46207 and the other requirements of this chapter:

(a) Borrego Springs Unified School District.

(b) Julian Union Elementary School District.

(c) Julian Union High School District.

(d) Warner Unified School District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 478, Sec. 1.   (SB 1440)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

37712.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing with the 2025–26 school year, the Stony Creek Joint Unified School District may operate one or more schools on a four-day school week if it complies with the instructional time requirements specified in Section 46207, the other requirements of this chapter, and all of the following requirements:

(1) (A) The school district shall annually, by no later than June 1, submit to the department for review and approval, a plan for how the school district will ensure that the minimum instructional minutes required pursuant to Section 46207 will be met in the following school year. The plan shall include, but not be limited to, an annual school calendar with at least five additional days
 of instruction than is otherwise needed to meet the minimum instructional minute requirements pursuant to Section 46207 in the event that one or more of the schools in the school district is prevented from operating for any of the reasons described in Section 41422 or 46392. If the school district does not need some or all of the five additional days of instruction in order to meet the minimum instructional minute requirements in that school year, the school district shall only offer the extra instructional days to pupils as necessary to meet those requirements.

(B) If the school district offered less than the minimum instructional minutes required pursuant to Section 46207, the school district shall be subject to the penalties described in subdivision (b) of Section 46207 and subdivision (c) of Section 46208. Nothing in this section shall be construed to subject the school district, if it has met the minimum instructional minutes required
 pursuant to Section 46207, to those penalties.

(2) (A) The school district makes a nutritionally adequate breakfast, and a nutritionally adequate lunch, available five days per week to any pupil who requests a meal, free of charge, and without consideration of the pupil’s eligibility for federally funded free or reduced-price meals.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), the following definitions apply:

(i) “Nutritionally adequate breakfast” is one that qualifies for reimbursement under the most current meal pattern for the federal School Breakfast Program, as defined in Section 220.8 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(ii) “Nutritionally adequate lunch” is one that qualifies for reimbursement under the most current meal
 pattern for the federal National School Lunch Program, as defined in Section 210.10 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) If the Stony Creek Joint Unified School District has an exclusive bargaining representative, it may operate a school on a four-day school week pursuant to this section only if the school district and the representative of each bargaining unit of school district employees mutually agree to that operation in a memorandum of understanding.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the Stony Creek Joint Unified School District operates a four-day school week pursuant to this section but subsequently experiences, in a single year, a decline in status in 50 percent or more of the state indicators used to measure performance that are included in the evaluation rubrics adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5, the school district, commencing with the following
 school year, shall not operate a four-day school week.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 478, Sec. 2.   (SB 1440)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative July 1, 2029.    Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 23. SUPPLEMENTAL SERVICES [38000. - 38139.]



  CHAPTER 1. Security Departments [38000. - 38005.]

38000.

(a) The governing board of a school district may establish a security department under the supervision of a chief of security as designated by, and under the direction of, the superintendent of the school district. In accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 45100) of Part 25, the governing board of a school district may employ personnel to ensure the safety of school district personnel and pupils and the security of the real and personal property of the school district. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section that a school district security department is supplementary to city and county law enforcement agencies and is not vested with general police powers.

(b) The
 governing board of a school district may establish a school police department under the supervision of a school chief of police and, in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 45100) of Part 25, may employ peace officers, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 830.32 of the Penal Code, to ensure the safety of school district personnel and pupils, and the security of the real and personal property of the school district.

(c) The governing board of a school district that establishes a security department or a police department shall set minimum qualifications of employment for the chief of security or school chief of police, respectively, including, but not limited to, prior employment as a peace officer or completion of a peace officer training course approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. A chief of
 security or school chief of police shall comply with the prior employment or training requirement set forth in this subdivision as of January 1, 1993, or a date one year subsequent to the initial employment of the chief of security or school chief of police by the school district, whichever occurs later. This subdivision shall not be construed to require the employment by a school district of additional personnel.

(d) A school district may assign a school police reserve officer who is deputized pursuant to Section 35021.5 to a schoolsite to supplement the duties of school police officers pursuant to this section.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to evaluate the presence of peace officers and other law enforcement on school campuses and to identity and consider alternative
 options to ensure pupil safety based on the needs of the local school communities. It is the intent of the Legislature to consider encouraging local educational agencies to use school resources currently allocated to such personnel, including school police departments and contracts with local police or sheriff departments, for pupil support services, such as mental health services and professional development for school employees on cultural competency and restorative justice, as needed, if found to be a more appropriate use of resources based upon the needs of the pupils and campuses that serve them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 17.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

38001.

Persons employed and compensated as members of a police department of a school district, when appointed and duly sworn, are peace officers, for the purposes of carrying out their duties of employment pursuant to Section 830.32 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38001.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure the safety of pupils, staff, and the public on or near California’s public schools, by providing school security officers with training that will enable them to deal with the increasingly diverse and dangerous situations they encounter.

(b) (1) Every school security officer employed by a school district shall complete the latest course of training developed by the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services of the Department of Consumer Affairs in consultation with the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training pursuant to Section 7583.45 of the Business and
 Professions Code. If a school security officer subject to the requirements of this subdivision is required to carry a firearm while performing their duties, that school security officer shall additionally satisfy the training requirements of Section 832 of the Penal Code.

(2) A school district shall provide the training required pursuant to this subdivision to all school security officers who are employees of the school district. A school district shall provide the training during the employee’s regular work hours, unless otherwise negotiated and mutually agreed upon with the employee’s exclusive representative.

(3) This subdivision does not require a school district to provide training to security guards who are not employees of the school district, including security guards who
 work on the property of the school district pursuant to a contract with a private licensed security agency. A school district that contracts for security services shall comply with the requirements of Section 45103.1.

(4) This subdivision shall not apply to a school security officer employed by a school district who works 20 or fewer hours per week as a school security officer until July 1, 2021.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “school district” includes a school district, county office of education, and charter school.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, “school security officer” means any person primarily employed or assigned pursuant to
 subdivision (b) to provide security services as a watchperson, security guard, or patrolperson on or about premises owned or operated by a school district to protect persons or property or to prevent the theft or unlawful taking of school district property of any kind or to report any unlawful activity to the school district and local law enforcement agencies.

(d) (1) A school security officer shall not be employed and shall not continue to be employed by a school district until both of the following conditions have been met:

(A) (i) The applicant or employee has submitted to the school district two copies of their fingerprints on forms or electronically, as prescribed by the Department of Justice. The school district shall submit the
 fingerprints to the Department of Justice, which shall submit one copy of the fingerprints to the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(ii) An applicant or contracted employee who holds a permanent registration with the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services of the Department of Consumer Affairs as a security guard need only submit one copy of their fingerprints, which copy shall be submitted to the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(iii) An applicant or contracted employee who is registered by the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services of the Department of Consumer Affairs, and who holds a firearms qualification card as specified in Section 7583.22 of the Business and Professions Code, is exempt from the requirements of this subdivision.

(B) The applicant or employee has been determined not to be a person prohibited from employment by a school district pursuant to Sections 44237 and 45122.1, or by the Department of Justice
 from possessing a firearm if the applicant is required to carry a firearm.

(2) The Department of Justice may participate in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS) in lieu of submitting fingerprints to the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation in order to meet the requirements of this subdivision relating to firearms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 475, Sec. 2.   (SB 390)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

38001.6.

(a) Every school peace officer first employed by a K–12 public school district before July 1, 1999, shall, in order to retain his or her employment, fulfill both of the following conditions:

(1) The employee shall submit to the school district one copy of his or her fingerprints on forms prescribed by the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice shall forward this copy to the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(2) The employee shall be determined to be a person who is not prohibited from employment by a school district pursuant to Sections 44237 and 45122.1, and, if the employee is required to
 carry a firearm, shall be determined by the Department of Justice to be a person who is not prohibited from possessing a firearm.

(b) The Department of Justice may participate in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS) in lieu of submitting fingerprints to the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation in order to meet the requirements of this section relating to firearms.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 39672 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 77.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

38002.

Moneys transferred into the general fund of any school district pursuant to Section 1463.12 of the Penal Code may be made available for the following purposes:

(a) The training of persons employed and compensated as members of a police department of a school district, pursuant to the requirements or approval of the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(b) The training of persons employed and compensated as members of a
 police department of a school district in other public safety skills, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) First aid.

(2) Rescue.

(3) Cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

(4) Emergency medical technician training.

(5) Juvenile procedures.

(6) Specialized safety equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38003.

Persons employed and compensated as members of a security or police department of a school district shall be supplied with and authorized to wear a badge bearing the name of the school district. The employee shall carry a suitable identification card bearing his or her photograph and signature and the signature of the superintendent of the school district. The employee shall also carry such other identification data as may be required by local law enforcement agencies. The governing board may direct the wearing of a distinctive uniform and shall prescribe same. The
 costs of required uniforms, equipment, identification badges, and cards shall be borne by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38004.

The governing board of a school district which establishes a security or police department may provide and maintain motor vehicles for the use of the department. Any vehicle, when operated in the performance of his or her duties by any member of the police department, is an authorized emergency vehicle and may be equipped and operated as such as provided by the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38004.5.

The governing board of a school district that establishes a school police department shall not permit the school police department to receive surplus military equipment pursuant to Section 2576a of Title 10 of the United States Code, unless the governing board of the school district does all of the following:

(a) Votes to approve the acquisition of surplus military equipment at a regularly scheduled public board meeting.

(b) Provides parents or guardians of
 pupils, and other members of the public, a chance to comment at a regularly scheduled public board meeting on the proposed acquisition of surplus military equipment, and, clearly and in a manner recognizable to the general public, identify in the agenda the topic to be discussed at the meeting.

(c) Provides a detailed description of the function and purpose of the surplus military equipment to be received.

(d) Identifies safe and secure storage for
 surplus military equipment to be received by a school police department.

(e) Ensures that peace officers employed by a school police department possess adequate training in the safe use and handling of the surplus military equipment to be received.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 79, Sec. 1.   (SB 242)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

38005.

The governing board of any school district may contract with a private licensed security agency to insure the safety of school district personnel and pupils and the security of the real and personal property of the school district when the personnel normally required to provide such service fail to do so because of an emergency including, but not limited to, war, epidemic, fire, flood, or work stoppage; or when such an emergency necessitates additional security services.

This section shall apply only if the governing board
 by a majority vote makes a specific finding that an emergency exists, and that this finding is included in the board minutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Drinking Water [38040. - 38043.]

38040.

For purposes of this chapter, “water bottle filling station” means a water dispenser accessible to all people in compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) that dispenses clean drinking water directly into a water bottle or other drinking container.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 793, Sec. 2.   (AB 2638)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

38041.

(a) (1) A new construction or modernization project submitted to the Division of the State Architect pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1 by a school district or the governing body of a charter school shall include water bottle filling stations, consistent with the requirements of this section.

(2) The requirements of this section only apply to those projects described in paragraph (1) that are submitted to the Division of the State Architect three months after voters approve a statewide general obligation bond that provides funds for school facilities for kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, at a statewide election occurring on or after November 1, 2022.

(b) (1) For modernization projects, there shall be a minimum of one water bottle filling station at each school undergoing modernization.

(2) For new construction projects, there shall be a minimum of one water bottle filling station per 350 people at each school being constructed.

(c) Water bottle filling stations shall be
 placed in or near high traffic and common areas, such as all of the following:

(1) Hallways.

(2) Gymnasiums.

(3) School food service areas.

(4) Outdoor recreation areas.

(5) Faculty lounges.

(d) Water bottle filling stations shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Dispense drinking water that meets primary drinking water standards and secondary drinking water standards, as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code. The water bottle filling
 station shall dispense filtered water if necessary to meet those standards.

(2) Be regularly cleaned to maintain sanitary conditions.

(3) Be maintained on a regular basis to ensure they function properly.

(e) Water bottle filling stations may be combined with drinking fountains.

(f) School districts and governing bodies of charter schools are encouraged to install touchless bottle filling stations for sanitary reasons.

(g) School districts and governing bodies of charter schools are encouraged to install water
 bottle filling stations that dispense cooled water if the water bottle filling stations are located near an electrical source.

(h) (1) An existing water bottle filling station that was installed at a school before the enactment of this chapter shall count toward the minimum number of water bottle filling stations required pursuant to subdivision (b), provided that the water bottle filling
 station meets the requirements of subdivision (d).
